California statutes. Vehicle Code
(b) Provide each of its franchised new motor vehicle dealers in this state with a list of the affected vehicle models on an annual basis and prior to
 the manufacturer’s introduction of its new model year vehicles. The list shall include sufficient information, including information regarding tire sizes where necessary, to allow the selling dealer to determine when disclosure is required pursuant to Section 11713.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9954.

(a) This section applies only to new vehicles sold or leased in this state on or after January 1, 2008, except as provided in subdivision (d) or (e).

(b) A motor vehicle manufacturer of a motor vehicle sold or leased in this state shall provide the means whereby the registered owner of that motor vehicle, through a registered locksmith, can access the information, and only that information, that is necessary to permit the production of a replacement key or other functionally similar
 device by the registered locksmith that will allow the registered vehicle’s owner to enter, start, and operate his or her vehicle. The means to access this information shall be available by telephone or electronically 24 hours a day and seven days a week, as follows:

(1) When a registered locksmith is requested by the motor vehicle’s registered owner or the registered owner’s family member, to produce a replacement key or other functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, and the information is needed from the vehicle manufacturer in order to produce the requested key or other functionally similar device, in addition to the requirement in Section 466.6 of the Penal Code, the registered locksmith shall visually verify the identity of the requesting party through that party’s driver’s license; shall visually verify that the registration of the vehicle matches the requesting party’s identity and
 address (or last name and address if the requesting party is a family member of the registered owner); and shall visually verify that the vehicle identification number of the vehicle matches with the vehicle identification number on the registration. Upon satisfactory verification of all three requirements, the registered locksmith shall sign an affidavit that he or she has visually verified the information and file the affidavit along with, and for the same time period as, the work order required by Section 466.6 of the Penal Code, and proceed to access the needed information from the vehicle manufacturer.

(2) Upon completing the services, the registered locksmith shall give any key code information obtained from the vehicle manufacturer to the registered owner, or if applicable, the owner’s family member, and shall destroy all information accessed from the vehicle manufacturer in his or her possession.

(3) Except in cases of fraud or misappropriation, a registered locksmith who follows these procedures shall incur no liability for theft of the vehicle related to the locksmith’s production of a replacement key or functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated.

(4) When a vehicle manufacturer receives a request from a registered locksmith for information to enable the locksmith to produce a replacement key or other functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, and that request is made at the behest of the vehicle’s registered owner or the registered owner’s family member, the vehicle manufacturer shall require the registered locksmith to confirm the locksmith’s registration with the manufacturer’s registry; provide the security password issued by the manufacturer; and comply with any other
 reasonable authentication procedure. The manufacturer shall also require the registered locksmith to confirm the locksmith’s visual identity and vehicle verifications, pursuant to paragraph (1). Upon satisfactory verification of these requirements, and upon presentation of the vehicle identification number and model number, the vehicle manufacturer shall provide to the registered locksmith, for the vehicle identified by the vehicle identification number and model number, the information necessary to enable production of a replacement key or other functionally similar device that allows the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated.

(5) A motor vehicle manufacturer subject to this section shall retain and make the information available in accordance with this section for at least 25 years from the date of manufacture.

(6) A vehicle manufacturer that follows these procedures
 shall incur no liability for theft of the vehicle related to furnishing the information to a registered locksmith for the production of a replacement key or functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated.

(c) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Information” includes, but is not limited to, the vehicle’s key code and, if applicable, immobilizer or access code, and its successor technology and terminology.

(2) “Motor vehicle” is a passenger vehicle as defined in Section 465 and pickup truck as defined in Section 471, and does not include a housecar, a motorcycle, or other two-wheeled motor vehicle.

(3) A “registered locksmith” means a locksmith licensed and bonded in California
 that has registered with a motor vehicle manufacturer, and has been issued a registry number and security password by the manufacturer.

(4) A registered owner, as defined in Section 505, also includes a lessee of the vehicle when the lessee’s name appears on the vehicle registration.

(d) (1) This section does not apply to a vehicle line of a motor vehicle manufacturer that on January 1, 2006, does not provide for the production of a replacement key or other functionally similar device that allows the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, by anyone other than the vehicle manufacturer itself and only itself, provided that the vehicle manufacturer operates a telephone or electronic request line 24 hours a day and seven days a week, and upon a request of the registered owner or family member of the registered owner of the vehicle, a replacement key or
 other functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, is furnished to the registered owner at a reasonable cost within one day of the request or via the next overnight delivery.

(2) If subsequent to January 1, 2008, a vehicle line of the manufacturer exempted by this subdivision provides for the production of a replacement by anyone, other than the vehicle manufacturer itself, of a key or other functionally similar device that will allow the vehicle to be entered, started, and operated, this section shall apply to that vehicle line.

(3) This subdivision shall remain operative until January 1, 2013, and as of that date shall become inoperative, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2013, deletes or extends that date.

(e) (1) This section does not apply to a vehicle line of a motor vehicle manufacturer that sold between 2,500 and 5,000 vehicles of that line in the prior calendar year in the state.

(2) This subdivision shall remain operative until January 1, 2013, and as of that date shall become inoperative, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2013, deletes or extends that date.

(f) This section shall not apply to a make that sold fewer than 2,500 vehicles in the prior calendar year in the state.

(g) The duties imposed on a manufacturer pursuant to this section may be performed either by the manufacturer or by an agent through a contract.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that
 invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9955.

(a) A manufacturer of a pocket bike shall affix on the pocket bike a sticker with a disclosure stating that the device is prohibited from being operated on a sidewalk, roadway, or any part of a highway, or on a bikeway, bicycle path or trail, equestrian trail, hiking or recreational trail, or on public lands open to off-highway motor vehicle use.

(b) The disclosure required under subdivision (a) shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a sticker that contains only the disclosure.

(2) Include the following statement:

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 323, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Manufacturer’s Responsibility for Safety Defects [9975. - 9975.]

9975.

Every manufacturer of a motor vehicle who furnishes notification to the registered owner of the motor vehicle of any defect in the motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment which relates to motor vehicle safety, shall, notwithstanding any limitation in any warranty relating to the motor vehicle, correct such defect without charge to the registered owner of the vehicle or, at the manufacturer’s election, reimburse the registered owner for the cost of making such correction.

The manufacturer of such motor vehicle shall not be liable for the cost of such correction if the registered owner of the motor vehicle does not seek to have the correction made within 45 days after receipt of the notification or within the warranty period of the motor vehicle, whichever is longer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Engine Manufacturers [9980. - 9982.]

9980.

If the manufacturer of the engine of a new motor vehicle is different from the manufacturer of the vehicle, the vehicle shall be labeled as required by Section 9981.

For purposes of this chapter, the manufacturer of a motor vehicle engine is different from the vehicle manufacturer if a majority of parts, or most of the work of assembly, of the engine is provided by a person other than the vehicle manufacturer or a subsidiary or affiliate of the vehicle manufacturer. For purposes of this chapter, an “affiliate” is an entity that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the manufacturer of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9981.

The manufacturer of any vehicle subject to Section 9980 shall affix a prominent label to the vehicle stating that the engine in the vehicle may have been manufactured by another manufacturer. The label shall be located on or adjacent to the window sticker identifying the manufacturer’s suggested retail price for the vehicle or, if none, it shall be located on or adjacent to the window sticker identifying the equipment provided with the vehicle. This label, however, is not required if the manufacturer of the engine contained in the vehicle is disclosed in sales literature or is noted in the sales contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9982.

This chapter applies only to new passenger vehicles and to new motortrucks with an unladen weight under 6,000 pounds, except housecars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Disclosure of Damage [9990. - 9993.]

9990.

For purposes of this chapter, damage sustained by a motor vehicle is material under any of the following circumstances:

(a) The damage required repairs having a value, including parts and labor calculated at the repairer’s cost, exceeding 3 percent of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price of the vehicle or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. The replacement of damaged or stolen components, excluding the cost of repainting or refinishing those components, if replaced by the installation of new original manufacturer’s equipment, parts, or accessories that are bolted or otherwise attached as a unit to the vehicle, including, but not limited to, the hood, bumpers, fenders, mechanical parts, instrument panels, moldings, glass, tires, wheels, and electronic instruments, shall be excluded from the damage calculation, except that any damage having a cumulative repair or replacement value which exceeds 10 percent of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price of the vehicle shall be deemed material.

(b) The damage was to the frame or drive train of the motor vehicle.

(c) The damage occurred in connection with a theft of the entire vehicle.

(d) The damage was to the suspension of the vehicle requiring repairs other than wheel balancing or alignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9991.

Every dealer shall disclose in writing to the purchaser of a new or previously unregistered motor vehicle, prior to entering into a contract for the vehicle or, if unknown at that time, prior to delivery of the vehicle, any material damage known by the dealer to have been sustained by the vehicle and subsequently repaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9992.

Every dealer shall disclose in writing to the purchaser of a new or previously unregistered motor vehicle, prior to entering into a contract for the vehicle or, if unknown at that time, prior to delivery of the vehicle, any damage, including, but not limited to, material damage, known by the dealer to have been sustained by the vehicle and not repaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9993.

Nothing in this chapter permits any dealer to respond to the inquiry of a purchaser in any untrue or misleading manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. SPECIAL ANTITHEFT LAWS [10500. - 10904.]



CHAPTER 1. Reports of Stolen Vehicles [10500. - 10505.]

10500.

(a) A peace officer, upon receiving a report based on reliable information that a vehicle registered under this code has been stolen, taken, or driven in violation of Section 10851, or that a leased or rented vehicle has not been returned within five days after its owner has made written demand for its return, by certified or registered mail, following the expiration of the lease or rental agreement, or that license plates for a vehicle have been lost or stolen, shall, immediately after receiving that information, report the information to the Department of Justice Stolen Vehicle System. An officer, upon receiving information of the recovery of a vehicle described in this subdivision, or of the recovery of plates which have been previously reported as lost or stolen, shall immediately
 report the fact of the recovery to the Department of Justice Stolen Vehicle System. At the same time, the recovering officer shall advise the Department of Justice Stolen Vehicle System and the original reporting law enforcement agency of the location and condition of the vehicle or license plates recovered. The original reporting law enforcement agency, upon receipt of the information from the recovering officer, shall immediately attempt to notify the reporting party by telephone, if the telephone number of the reporting party is available or readily accessible, of the location and condition of the recovered vehicle. If the reporting party’s telephone number is unknown, or notification attempts were unsuccessful, the original reporting law enforcement agency shall notify the reporting party by placing, in the mail, a notice providing the location and condition of the recovered vehicle. This written notice shall be mailed within 24 hours of the original reporting law enforcement agency’s receipt of the
 information of the recovery of the vehicle, excluding holidays and weekends.

(b) If the recovered vehicle is subject to parking or storage charges, Section 10652.5 applies.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   (AB 391)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to make or file a false or fraudulent report of theft of a vehicle required to be registered under this code with any law enforcement agency with intent to deceive.

(b) If a person has been previously convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), he or she is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, or in a county jail for not to exceed one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 601.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

(a) The owner or legal owner of a vehicle registered under this code which has been stolen or embezzled may notify the Department of the California Highway Patrol of the theft or embezzlement, but in the event of an embezzlement other than an embezzlement as specified in Section 10855, may make the report only after having procured the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person charged with the embezzlement.

(b) Every owner or legal owner who has given any notice under subdivision (a) shall notify the Department of the California Highway Patrol of a recovery of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

The Department of Justice upon receiving notice under this chapter that a vehicle has been stolen, or taken or driven in violation of Section 10851, or that a vehicle reported stolen, or taken or driven in violation of Section 10851 has been recovered, shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the reported theft, taking or driving, or recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

The department upon receiving a report of a stolen vehicle, or of a vehicle taken or driven in violation of Section 10851, shall place an appropriate notice in the electronic file system which will identify such vehicles during the processing of new certificates of registration, ownership, or registration and ownership. When such vehicles are thus identified, processing shall be discontinued and the Department of Justice shall be notified. New certificates shall not be issued until cleared by the Department of Justice. Notices shall remain in the Department of Motor Vehicles system until a Department of Justice deletion is received.

A report of a stolen vehicle, or of a vehicle taken or driven in violation of Section 10851, is effective for a period of not less than one year from the date first reported or longer as the department may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

Upon the transfer of registration of a vehicle reported as stolen or embezzled, the department shall immediately notify the reporting agency of such fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Reports of Stolen Vessels [10550. - 10554.]

10550.

In this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning, the terms and definitions set forth in Section 9840 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

10551.

Every peace officer upon receiving a report based on reliable information that any undocumented vessel numbered under this code has been stolen shall immediately after receiving such information report the theft to the Department of Justice, Automated Boat System, and such peace officer upon receiving information of the recovery of any such vessel which he has previously reported as stolen, shall immediately report the fact of the recovery to the Department of Justice, Automated Boat System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

10551.5.

The Department of Justice upon receiving notice under this chapter that a vessel has been stolen or that a vessel reported stolen has been recovered shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the reported theft or recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

10552.

It is unlawful for any person to make or file a false or fraudulent report of the theft of an undocumented vessel required to be numbered under this code with any law enforcement agents with intent to deceive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

10553.

The owner or legal owner of a vessel numbered under this code which has been stolen or embezzled may notify a law enforcement agency of the theft or embezzlement, but in the event of an embezzlement may make the report only after having procured the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person charged with such embezzlement. Every owner or legal owner who has given any such notice shall notify the law enforcement agency of a recovery of the vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10554.

The department upon receiving a report of a stolen or embezzled vessel shall place an appropriate notice in the electronic file system which will identify such vessel during the processing of new certificates of number, ownership, or number and ownership. When such vessels are thus identified, processing shall be discontinued and the agency holding the theft report and the Department of Justice shall be notified. New certificates shall not be issued until cleared by the Department of Justice. Notices shall remain in the Department of Motor Vehicles system until a Department of Justice deletion is received.

A report of a stolen or embezzled vessel is effective for a period of not less than one year from the date first reported, or for such longer period as the department may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Reports of Stored Vehicles [10650. - 10658.]

10650.

(a) Every operator of a towing service and every keeper of a garage or trailer park shall keep a written record of every vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code stored for a period longer than 12 hours.

(b) The record shall contain the name and address of the person storing the vehicle or requesting the towing, the names of the owner and driver of the vehicle, if ascertainable, and a brief description of the vehicle including the name or make, the motor or other number of the vehicle, the nature of any damage to the vehicle, and the license number and registration number shown by the license plates or registration card, if either of the latter is attached to the vehicle in a clearly discernible place.

(c) All records shall be kept for one year from the commencement of storage and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer.

(d) Upon termination of the storage, a statement shall be added to the record as to the disposition of the vehicle, including the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle was released and the date of such release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

10652.

Whenever any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code has been stored in a garage, repair shop, parking lot, or trailer park for 30 days, the keeper shall report such fact to the Department of Justice by receipted mail, which shall at once notify the legal owner as of record. This section shall not apply to any vehicle stored by a peace officer or employee designated in Section 22651 pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 22850) of Chapter 10 of Division 11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 699, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10652.5.

(a) Whenever the name and address of the legal owner of a motor vehicle is known, or may be ascertained from the registration records in the vehicle or from the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles, no fee or service charge may be imposed upon the legal owner for the parking and storage of the motor vehicle except as follows: (1) The first 15 days of possession and (2) following that 15-day period, the period commencing 3 days after written notice is sent by the person in possession to the legal owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, and continuing for a period not to exceed any applicable time limit set forth in Section 3068 or 3068.1 of the Civil Code.

(b) The costs
 of notifying the legal owner may be charged as part of the storage fee when the motor vehicle has been stored for an indefinite period of time and notice is given no sooner than the third day of possession. This subdivision also applies if the legal owner refuses to claim possession of the motor vehicle.

(c) In any action brought by, or on behalf of, a legal owner of a motor vehicle to which subdivision (a) applies, to recover a motor vehicle alleged to be withheld by the person in possession of the motor vehicle by demanding storage fees or charges for any number of days in excess of that permitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, not to exceed one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750). The recovery of those fees is in addition to any other right, remedy, or cause of
 action of that party.

(d) All storage and towing fees charged to a legal owner of a motor vehicle shall be reasonable. The following rates and fees are presumptively unreasonable:

(1) Administrative or filing fees, except those incurred related to documentation from the Department of Motor Vehicles and those related to the lien sale of a vehicle.

(2) Security fees.

(3) Dolly fees.

(4) Load and unload fees.

(5) Pull-out fees.

(6) Gate fees, except when the owner or insurer of
 the vehicle requests that the vehicle be released outside of normal business hours.

(7) When gate fees are reasonably assessed, any additional towing fees that exceed 10 percent of the normal towing rate due to the call originating after normal business hours.

(8) Any storage fees charged for state holidays that exceed the posted standard daily storage rate.

(9) (A) Towing fees when the owner or the operator of a tow truck is directed by a law enforcement officer to remove
 a vehicle to the nearest shoulder or to level ground adjacent to the roadway for the sole purpose of clearing a roadway to facilitate access by an emergency vehicle at the scene of a state emergency, as defined in Section 8625 of the Government Code, or a local emergency, as defined in Section 8630 of the Government Code.

(B) An owner or operator of a tow truck that removes a vehicle under the circumstances described in subparagraph (A) and acts in good faith shall not be subject to civil liability for any damage to personal property that results from the removal of the vehicle.

(C) The limitation of liability described in subparagraph (B) shall not apply to an act or omission by an owner or operator of a tow truck that constitutes
 gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(10) Following a request from the vehicle owner to release their vehicle, and upon payment of all fees then due, storage fees for any day that a storage facility fails to release the vehicle.

(11) Storage fees in excess of 50 percent of the daily storage rate when a vehicle is recovered within the first four hours of storage.

(e) This section is not applicable to any motor vehicle stored by a levying officer acting under the authority of judicial process.

(f) Nothing in subdivision (d) prohibits any fees authorized in a written agreement between a
 law enforcement agency and a towing or storage company, including, but not limited to, official police garages operating under the jurisdiction of a municipal police commission, if the tow was initiated by the law enforcement agency.

(g) For purposes of this section, “normal business hours” means Monday through Friday from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., inclusive, except for state holidays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   (AB 987)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10653.

Whenever any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code which shows evidence of having been struck by a bullet is stored in a garage or repair shop, the keeper thereof shall within 24 hours after receiving the vehicle report such fact to the sheriff’s office of the county or police department of the city wherein the garage or repair shop is located, giving the motor or other number of the vehicle, the license number if ascertainable, and the name and address of the person storing the same or the name and address of the owner shown by the registration card, if the same is attached to the vehicle in a clearly discernible place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10654.

Every person other than the keeper of a garage renting any private building used as a private garage or space therein for the storage of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, when the agreement to rent includes only the building or space therein, shall within 24 hours after the vehicle is stored therein report such fact together with the name of the tenant, and a description of the vehicle, including the name or make, the motor or other number of the vehicle, and the license number to the sheriff’s office of the county or the police department of the city wherein the building is located. “Private garage” as used in this section does not include a public warehouse or public garage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10655.

No person required to keep a record or make a report under this chapter shall wilfully fail, refuse, or neglect to comply with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10656.

The director, deputy director, registrar, deputy registrar, investigators of the department, and members of a city police department or county sheriff’s office whose primary responsibility is to conduct vehicle theft investigations, may inspect any vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code in any garage, repair shop, parking lot, used car lot, automobile dismantlers lot, or other similar establishment for the purpose of investigating the title and registration of vehicles and inspection of vehicles wrecked or dismantled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

10658.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the storage of any recreational vehicle owned by a mobilehome park resident and stored in a mobilehome park.

(b) As used in this section, “recreational vehicle” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 18215.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and “mobilehome park” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Alteration or Removal of Numbers [10750. - 10753.]

10750.

(a) No person shall intentionally deface, destroy, or alter the motor number, other distinguishing number, or identification mark of a vehicle required or employed for registration purposes without written authorization from the department, nor shall any person place or stamp any serial, motor, or other number or mark upon a vehicle, except one assigned thereto by the department.

(b) This section does not prohibit the restoration by an owner of the original vehicle identification number when the restoration is authorized by the department, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing in the ordinary course of business numbers or marks upon new motor vehicles or new parts thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970.   Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

10751.

(a) No person shall knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, or have in his or her possession, any vehicle, or component part thereof, from which any serial or identification number, including, but not limited to, any number used for registration purposes, that is affixed by the manufacturer to the vehicle or component part, in whatever manner deemed proper by the manufacturer, has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, unless the vehicle or component part has attached thereto an identification number assigned or approved by the department in lieu of the manufacturer’s number. 

(b) Whenever a vehicle described in subdivision (a), including a vehicle assembled with any component part which is in violation of subdivision (a), comes into the custody of a peace officer, it shall be destroyed, sold, or otherwise disposed of under the conditions as provided in an order by the court having jurisdiction. No court order providing for disposition shall be issued unless the person from whom the property was seized, and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on registration records in the Department of Motor Vehicles, are provided a postseizure hearing by the court having jurisdiction within 90 days after the seizure. This subdivision shall not apply with respect to a seized vehicle or component part used as evidence in any criminal action or proceeding. Nothing in this section shall, however, preclude the return of a seized vehicle or a component part to the owner by the seizing agency following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership and, if determined necessary, upon the assignment of an identification number to the vehicle or component part by the department.

(c) Whenever a vehicle described in subdivision (a) comes into the custody of a peace officer, the person from whom the property was seized, and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on registration records in the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall be notified within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the seizure, of the date, time, and place of the hearing required in subdivision (b). The notice shall contain the information specified in subdivision (d). 

(d) Whenever a peace officer seizes a vehicle described in subdivision (a), the person from whom the property was seized shall be provided a notice of impoundment of the vehicle which shall serve as a receipt and contain the following information:

(1) Name and address of person from whom the property was seized. 

(2) A statement that the vehicle seized has been impounded for investigation of a violation of Section 10751 of the California Vehicle Code and that the property will be released upon a determination that the serial or identification number has not been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, or upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership of the vehicle or a component part, if no other person claims an interest in the property; otherwise, a hearing regarding the disposition of the vehicle shall take place in the proper court. 

(3) A statement that the person from whom the property was seized, and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on registration records in the Department of Motor Vehicles, will receive written notification of the date, time, and place of the hearing within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the seizure.

(4) Name and address of the law enforcement agency where evidence of ownership of the vehicle or component part may be presented.

(5) A statement of the contents of Section 10751 of the Vehicle Code. 

(e) A hearing on the disposition of the property shall be held by the superior court within 90 days after the seizure. The hearing shall be before the court without a jury. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case.

(1) If the evidence reveals either that the serial or identification number has not been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed or that the number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed but satisfactory evidence of ownership has been presented to the seizing agency or court, the property shall be released to the person entitled thereto. Nothing in this section precludes the return of the vehicle or a component part to a good faith purchaser following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership thereof upon the assignment of an identification number to the vehicle or component part by the department.

(2) If the evidence reveals that the identification number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, and satisfactory evidence of ownership has not been presented, the vehicle shall be destroyed, sold, or otherwise disposed of as provided by court order. 

(3) At the hearing, the seizing agency has the burden of establishing that the serial or identification number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed and that no satisfactory evidence of ownership has been presented.

(f) This section does not apply to a scrap metal processor engaged primarily in the acquisition, processing, and shipment of ferrous and nonferrous scrap, and who receives dismantled vehicles from licensed dismantlers, licensed junk collectors, or licensed junk dealers as scrap metal for the purpose of recycling the dismantled vehicles for their metallic content, the end product of which is the production of material for recycling and remelting purposes for steel mills, foundries, smelters, and refiners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 596.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.

(a) No person shall, with intent to prejudice, damage, injure, or defraud, acquire, possess, sell, or offer for sale any genuine or counterfeit manufacturer’s serial or identification number from or for, or purporting to be from or for, a vehicle or component part thereof.

(b) No person shall, with intent to prejudice, damage, injure, or defraud, acquire, possess, sell, or offer for sale any genuine or counterfeit serial or identification number issued by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or the vehicle registration and titling agency of any foreign jurisdiction which is from or for, or purports to be from or for, a vehicle or component part
 thereof.

(c) Every person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in the county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 602.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.
